Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.202

Certificate, license, or registration suspension—Noncompliance with support order—Reissuance.

The director shall immediately suspend any certificate, license, or registration issued under this chapter if the holder has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the certificate, license, or registration shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

[ 2005 c 339 s 17; 1997 c 58 s 832.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.